Utah statutes.
53A-26a-301.   Certification required -- Classes of certification.

(1) Except as specifically provided in Section 53A-26a-305, an individual is required to be certified as a certified interpreter if that individual provides interpreter services and a state or federal law requires the interpreter to be certified or qualified.

(2)  The State Board of Education shall issue a certification to any person who qualifies under this chapter in classifications determined by the board based upon recommendations from the advisory board.



Amended by Chapter 385, 2013 General Session

